Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.27
Lead-based paint activities, defined.

Lead-based paint activities means, in the case of target housing and child-occupied facilities, inspection, risk assessment, and abatement.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 29.